Utah statutes.
31A-22-1702.   Definitions.

Notwithstanding Section 31A-1-301, as used in this part:

(1)  "Certificate holder" means a person who:

(a)  requests, obtains, or possesses a certificate of insurance; and

(b)  is not a policyholder.

(2)  "Certificate of insurance" means a document that is prepared for or issued to a person who is not a policyholder as evidence of insurance, regardless of how it is titled or described.

(3)  "Insurer" means:

(a)  an insurer as defined in Section 31A-1-301; and

(b)  any other person engaged in the business of making insurance or a surety contract.

(4)  "Person," in addition to the definition in Section 31A-1-301, includes:

(a)  to the extent not prohibited by federal law:

(i)  the federal government; or

(ii)  an administrative unit of the federal government;

(b)  the state;

(c)  an administrative unit of the state;

(d)  a political subdivision of the state; or

(e)  an administrative unit of a political subdivision of the state.

(5)  "Policyholder" means a person who contracts with a property and casualty insurer for insurance coverage.



Enacted by Chapter 253, 2011 General Session

